Maryland, session 2026, SB0935.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0935*

SENATE BILL 935
10–208.
(a) In addition to the modification under § 10–207 of this subtitle, the amounts
under this section are subtracted from the federal adjusted gross income of a resident to
determine Maryland adjusted gross income.
(DD) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “DONATION” MEANS AN IRREVOCABLE GIFT OF FOOD OR
CASH THAT IS SPECIFICALLY DESIGNATED FOR THE PURCHASE OF FOOD.
(III) “FOOD BANK” MEANS:
1. A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION LOCATED IN THE STATE
THAT:
A. IS QUALIFIED AS TAX EXEMPT UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF
THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE; AND
B. IS ESTABLISHED AND OPERATING PRIMARILY FOR
THE PURPOSE OF PROVIDING FOOD AT NO CHARGE TO INDIVIDUALS IN NEED; OR
2. AN ENTITY IN THE STATE THAT IS ESTABLISHED BY A
LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR IS A UNIT OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT THAT OPERATES
PRIMARILY FOR THE PURPOSE OF PROVIDING FOOD AT NO CHARGE TO INDIVIDUALS
IN NEED.
(IV) “QUALIFIED CHARITABLE ENTITY” MEANS A FOOD BANK,
HOMELESS SHELTER, DOMESTIC VIOLENCE SHELTER, RELIGIOUS ORGANIZATION,
OR OTHER CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION THAT HAS REGISTERED WITH THE
COMPTROLLER AS A DISTRIBUTOR OF FOOD THAT IS PROVIDED AT NO CHARGE TO
INDIVIDUALS IN NEED.
(2) SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
SUBTRACTION ALLOWED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION INCLUDES UP TO
$1,000 OF DONATIONS MADE BY A TAXPAYER DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR TO A
QUALIFIED CHARITABLE ENTITY.
(3) TO QUALIFY FOR THE SUBTRACTION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION,
THE TAXPAYER SHALL FILE WITH THE TAXPAYER’S INCOME TAX RETURN:

SENATE BILL 935 3
(I) THE NAME OF EACH QUALIFIED CHARITABLE ENTITY TO
WHICH A DONATION WAS MADE;
(II) PROOF OF THE VALUE OF THE DONATION; AND
(III) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE COMPTROLLER
REQUIRES.
(4) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT
THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBSECTION, INCLUDING THE CRITERIA AND
PROCEDURES FOR REGISTRATION AS A QUALIFIED CHARITABLE ENTITY.
10–308.
(a) In addition to the modification under § 10–307 of this subtitle, the amounts
under this section are subtracted from the federal taxable income of a corporation to
determine Maryland modified income.
(b) The subtraction under subsection (a) of this section includes the amounts
allowed to be subtracted for an individual under:
(1) § 10–208(d) of this title (Enhanced agricultural management
equipment expenses);
(2) § 10–208(i) of this title (Reforestation or timber stand expenses);
(3) § 10–208(k) of this title (Wage expenses for targeted jobs);
(4) § 10–208(p) of this title (Elevator handrails in health care facilities);
(5) § 10–208(z) of this title (Donations to diaper banks and other charitable
entities); [and]
(6) § 10–208(bb) of this title (Trade or business expenses of a licensed or
registered cannabis grower, processor, dispensary, or any other cannabis establishment);
AND
(7) § 10–208(DD) OF THIS TITLE (DONATIONS TO FOOD BANKS AND
OTHER CHARITABLE ENTITIES).
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That on or before January 1, 2029,
the Comptroller shall report to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article, on whether donations of food or cash that is specifically
designated for the purchase of food to charitable entities that provide food at no charge to
individuals in need have increased following the effective date of this Act and, if so, whether

SENATE BILL 935
the subtraction modification under § 10–208(dd) of the Tax – General Article, as enacted
under Section 1 of this Act, has contributed to that increase.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, but
before January 1, 2029. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of
June 30, 2029, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.